Maryland, session 2025, SB0805.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
1–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(j) (1) “First responder” means an employee of a State or local public safety
agency that provides emergency response services.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0805*

SENATE BILL 805
(2) “First responder” includes:
(i) a firefighter;
(ii) a paramedic;
(iii) an emergency medical technician;
(IV) AN EMERGENCY RESPONSE TECHNICIAN EMPLOYED BY THE
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION;
(V) A FACILITY MAINTENANCE TECHNICIAN EMPLOYED BY THE
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION;
(VI) A VEHICLE SERVICES AND RECOVERY TECHNICIAN
EMPLOYED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION;
[(iv)] (VII) a rescue squad member;
[(v)] (VIII) a sworn member of the Office of the State Fire Marshal;
[(vi)] (IX) a member of a volunteer fire or rescue company who is a
covered employee under § 9–234 of the Labor and Employment Article;
[(vii)] (X) an individual who is licensed or certified under § 13–516
of the Education Article; and
[(viii)] (XI) a 9–1–1 specialist.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.